New Jersey, session 222, A2012.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2009, c.329 (C.30:1B-6.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    [The] Except as provided in subsection m. of this section, the Commissioner of Corrections shall provide to each inmate at least 10 days prior to release from a State correctional facility: a.     A copy of the inmate's criminal history record and written information on the inmate's right to have his criminal records expunged under chapter 52 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes; b.    General written information on the inmate's right to vote under R.S.19:4-1; c.     General written information on the availability of programs, including faith-based and secular programs, that would assist in removing barriers to the inmate's employment or participation in vocational or educational rehabilitative programs, including but not limited to, information concerning the "Rehabilitated Convicted Offenders Act," P.L.1968, c.282 (C.2A:168A-1 et seq.) and the certificate of rehabilitation under P.L.2007, c.327 (C.2A:168A-7 et seq.); d.    A detailed written record of the inmate's participation in educational, training, employment, and medical or other treatment programs while the inmate was incarcerated; e.     A written accounting of the fines, assessments, surcharges, restitution, penalties, child support arrearages, and any other obligations due and payable by the inmate upon release; f.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2020, c.45) g.    A copy of the inmate's birth certificate, as issued by the Department of Health, Office of Vital Statistics, if the inmate was born in New Jersey; h.    Assistance in obtaining a Social Security card; i.     A one-day New Jersey bus or rail pass; j.     A two-week supply of prescription medication and, to the extent consistent with clinical guidelines, a two-week prescription order with two additional refills; k.    General written information concerning child support, including child support payments owed by the inmate, information on how to seek child support payments and information on where to seek services regarding child support, child custody, and establishing parentage; [and] l. (1) A medical discharge summary, which shall include instructions on how to obtain from the commissioner a copy of the inmate's full medical record.  Upon request from the inmate, the commissioner shall provide a copy of the inmate's full medical record in a safe and secure manner, at no charge to the inmate. (2) Within 90 days of the effective date of this act, the commissioner, in consultation with the State Board of Medical Examiners, shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to ensure that these records are expeditiously and securely provided, in a manner consistent with the provision of medical records by other providers; and m.   In the case of a female inmate, family planning services. (cf: P.L.2021, c.312, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month after enactment.